Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 6 Disposal of Solid Wastes and Other Refuse
8-6-407. Refuse hauling by uncovered vehicles.

A person engaged in commercial or for-hire hauling who operates a truck or other vehicle within this state shall not transport litter, trash, or garbage unless the truck or other vehicle is covered to prevent its contents from blowing, dropping, falling off, or otherwise departing from the truck or other vehicle.

A person operating his or her own truck or other vehicle to transport litter, trash, or garbage shall take reasonable steps to prevent its contents from blowing, dropping, falling off, or otherwise departing from the truck or other vehicle.

However, a vehicle hauling predominately metallic material is not required to be covered if it is loaded in a manner that will prevent the material from falling or dropping from the vehicle.

A person who violates this section upon conviction is guilty of a violation and shall be fined an amount not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and is subject to community service under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section.

A person who violates this section for a second or subsequent offense within three (3) years of a prior offense upon conviction is guilty of a violation and shall be fined an amount not less than two hundred dollars ($200) and not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) and is subject to community service under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section.

In addition to any sentence provided for under this subsection, the court upon conviction shall impose the following penalty of community service:

For a first offense, not more than eight (8) hours; or

For a second or subsequent offense, not more than twenty-four (24) hours.

A person may also be required by the court as a part of his or her sentence to remove litter from alongside highways and other appropriate locations for any prescribed period.

A person convicted of a violation of this section who fails to pay any fines assessed in accordance with the findings and orders of the court shall have his or her driver's license suspended for six (6) months by the Department of Finance and Administration upon receipt by the department of an order of denial of driving privileges from the court under this section.

A person who violates this section and who is found to have committed the violation in furtherance of or as a part of a commercial enterprise, whether or not that commercial enterprise is the disposal of wastes, upon conviction is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

A person convicted of commercial littering may be required to remove litter disposed of in violation of this subchapter.

All or any portion of the fines, community service, and imprisonment penalties provided by this section may be suspended by the court if the violator agrees to remove litter from alongside highways and at other appropriate locations for a prescribed period.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3906; Acts 2015, No. 1264, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment deleted “Commercial” at the beginning of the section heading; designated the existing language as (a) and (b); and added (c) through (e).

8-6-408. Discarding certain items prohibited.

It is unlawful for a person to place or cause to be placed any junk motor vehicle, old vehicle tire, or inoperative or abandoned household appliance, or part of a junk motor vehicle, old vehicle tire, or inoperative or abandoned household appliance upon the right-of-way of any public highway, upon any other public property, or upon any private property that he or she does not own, lease, rent, or otherwise control, unless it is at a salvage yard, a permitted disposal site, or at the business establishment of a demolisher.

A person who violates this section upon conviction is guilty of:

A violation for a first offense and shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000) and sentenced to one hundred (100) hours of community service; and

A Class A misdemeanor for a second or subsequent offense.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3910; Acts 2015, No. 1264, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment designated the existing language as (a); and added (b).

8-6-409. Prima facie evidence against drivers.

If the throwing, dumping, or depositing of litter was done from a vehicle, except a motor bus, it shall be prima facie evidence that the throwing, dumping, or depositing was done by the driver of the vehicle.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3905.

8-6-410. Notice to the public required.

The state shall erect signs containing pertinent portions of this subchapter along the public highways of this state and in all campgrounds and trailer parks, forestlands, and recreational areas, at all public beaches, and at other public places where persons are to be informed of the existence and content of this subchapter and the penalties for violating this subchapter’s provisions.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3908.

8-6-411. Litter receptacles.

The state shall place litter receptacles along public highways in appropriate numbers to provide motorists with convenient methods of litter disposal.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3909.

8-6-412. Enforcement generally. [Effective until May 1, 2020.]

All Arkansas-certified law enforcement officers:

Shall enforce this subchapter;

May issue citations to or arrest persons violating any provision of this subchapter; and

May serve and execute all warrants, citations, and other process issued by the courts in enforcing this subchapter.

In addition, mailing by registered mail of the process to the person's last known place of residence shall be deemed as personal service upon the person charged.

Illegal dumps control officers licensed and certified in accordance with § 8-6-905 and code enforcement officers as defined by municipal ordinance may:

Enforce this subchapter; and

Issue citations to persons violating this subchapter.

However, illegal dumps control officers licensed and certified in accordance with § 8-6-905 and code enforcement officers as defined by municipal ordinance shall not:

Have the powers of arrest;

Carry firearms; or

Take any other official law enforcement actions.

All certified law enforcement officers may serve and execute all warrants, citations, and other process issued by the courts in enforcing this subchapter.

In addition, mailing by registered mail of the process to the person's last known place of residence shall be deemed as personal service upon the person charged.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3903; Acts 1999, No. 386, § 1; 2005, No. 75, § 1; 2007, No. 377, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

For text of section effective May 1, 2020, see the following version.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment deleted “the provisions of” following “enforce” in (a)(1), (a)(3)(A) and (c)(1); substituted “May” for “Are empowered to” in (a)(2); added “and code enforcement officers as defined by municipal ordinance may” in (b)(1); substituted “Enforce” for “May enforce the provisions of” in (b)(1)(A); substituted “Issue” for “Are empowered to issue” in (b)(1)(B); and substituted “licensed and certified in accordance with § 8-6-905 and code enforcement officers as defined by municipal ordinance shall” for “may” in (b)(2).

8-6-412. Enforcement generally. [Effective May 1, 2020.]

All Arkansas-certified law enforcement officers:

Shall enforce this subchapter;

May issue citations to or arrest persons violating any provision of this subchapter; and

May serve and execute all warrants, citations, and other process issued by the courts in enforcing this subchapter.

In addition, mailing by registered mail of the process to the person's last known place of residence shall be deemed as personal service upon the person charged.

[Repealed.]

All certified law enforcement officers may serve and execute all warrants, citations, and other process issued by the courts in enforcing this subchapter.

In addition, mailing by registered mail of the process to the person's last known place of residence shall be deemed as personal service upon the person charged.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3903; Acts 1999, No. 386, § 1; 2005, No. 75, § 1; 2007, No. 377, § 1; 2019, No. 1067, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 11, provided:

“(a)

The purpose of this act is to have the Environmental Compliance Resource Program operational and to make illegal dump control officers unnecessary on or before May 1, 2020.

“(b)

If legislation concerning the transformation of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is enacted during this Regular Session of the General Assembly, the Arkansas Code Revisor and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall correct the references to the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality consistent with those laws”.

Publisher's Notes.

For text of section effective until May 1, 2020, see the preceding version.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment deleted “the provisions of” following “enforce” in (a)(1), (a)(3)(A) and (c)(1); substituted “May” for “Are empowered to” in (a)(2); added “and code enforcement officers as defined by municipal ordinance may” in (b)(1); substituted “Enforce” for “May enforce the provisions of” in (b)(1)(A); substituted “Issue” for “Are empowered to issue” in (b)(1)(B); and substituted “licensed and certified in accordance with § 8-6-905 and code enforcement officers as defined by municipal ordinance shall” for “may” in (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment repealed (b).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 4: May 1, 2020.

8-6-413. Authority to take possession of discarded items — Notice.

Any enforcement agency described in § 8-6-412 which has knowledge of, discovers, or finds any junk motor vehicle, old vehicle tire, or inoperative or discarded household appliance on either public or private property may take it into custody and possession.

The enforcement agency may employ its own personnel, equipment, and facilities or hire persons, equipment, and facilities for the purpose of removing, preserving, and storing junk motor vehicles, old vehicle tires, or inoperative or abandoned household appliances.

However, before taking any junk motor vehicle into custody and possession from private property, the enforcement agency shall give the private property owner and the owner of the junk motor vehicle, if ascertainable, thirty (30) days' notice by registered or certified mail or seventy-two (72) hours' notice by personal service that such an action will be taken unless the junk motor vehicle is:

Restored to a functional use;

Disposed of by the owner in a manner not prohibited by this subchapter; or

Placed in an enclosed building.

The thirty-days' or seventy-two-hours' notice under subdivision (b)(1) of this section may be waived by the owners of the property.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3912; Acts 2005, No. 1222, § 1.

8-6-414. Notification to motor vehicle owner and lienholders — Reclamation.

The enforcement agency which takes into custody and possession any junk motor vehicle, within thirty (30) days after taking custody and possession thereof, shall notify the last known registered owner of the junk motor vehicle and all lienholders of record that the junk motor vehicle has been taken into custody and possession.

The notification shall be by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested.

The notice shall:

Contain a description of the junk motor vehicle, including the year, make, model, manufacturer's serial or identification number, or any other number which may have been assigned to the junk motor vehicle by the Office of Motor Vehicle and shall note any distinguishing marks;

Set forth the location of the facility where the junk motor vehicle is being held and the location where the junk motor vehicle was taken into custody and possession; and

Inform the owner and any lienholders of record of their right to reclaim the junk motor vehicle within ten (10) days after the date notice was received by the owner or lienholders upon payment of all towing, preservation, and storage charges resulting from taking and placing the junk motor vehicle into custody and possession and state that the failure of the owner or lienholders of record to exercise their right to reclaim the junk motor vehicle within the ten-day period shall be deemed a waiver by the owner and all lienholders of record of all right, title, and interest in the junk motor vehicle and of their consent to the sale or disposal of the junk motor vehicle at a public auction or to a salvage yard or demolisher.

If the identity of the last registered owner of the junk motor vehicle cannot be determined, if the certificate of registration or certificate of title contains no address for the owner, or if it is impossible to determine with reasonable certainty the identity and addresses of all lienholders, then notice shall be published in a newspaper of countywide circulation in the county wherein the junk motor vehicle was located at the time the enforcement agency took custody and possession of the junk motor vehicle.

This notice shall be sufficient to meet all requirements of notice pursuant to this section.

Any notice by publication may contain multiple listings of junk motor vehicles.

The notice shall be published within thirty (30) days after the junk motor vehicle is taken into custody and possession.

The notice shall have the same contents required for a notice pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, except that the ten-day period shall run from the date such notice is published as prescribed.

The consequences and effect of failure to reclaim a junk motor vehicle within the ten-day period after notice is received by registered or certified mail or within ten (10) days after the notice is published in a newspaper as prescribed shall be set forth in the notice.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3913.

8-6-415. Sale of junk motor vehicles and discarded items.

If a junk motor vehicle is not reclaimed as provided for in § 8-6-414, the enforcement agency in possession of the junk motor vehicle shall sell it either at a public auction or to a salvage yard or demolisher. The purchaser of the junk motor vehicle shall take title to the junk motor vehicle free and clear of all liens and claims of ownership and shall receive a sales receipt from the enforcement agency which disposed of the junk motor vehicle. The sales receipt at the sale shall be sufficient title only for purposes of transferring the junk motor vehicle to a salvage yard or to a demolisher for demolition, wrecking, or dismantling. No further titling of the junk motor vehicle shall be necessary by either the purchaser at the auction, the salvage yard, or the demolisher, who shall be exempt from the payment of any fees and taxes.

When an enforcement agency has in its custody and possession old vehicle tires or inoperative or discarded household appliances collected in accordance with § 8-6-413, it shall sell property, from time to time, at public auction or to a salvage yard or demolisher.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3914.

8-6-416. Disposition of sale proceeds.

From the proceeds of any sale, the enforcement agency which sold the junk motor vehicle, old vehicle tire, or inoperative or discarded household appliance shall reimburse itself for any expenses it may have incurred in removing, towing, preserving, and storing the property and for the expenses of conducting any auction and any notice and publication expenses incurred pursuant to this subchapter.

Any remainder from the proceeds of the sale shall be deposited into the State Treasury to be kept and maintained in the Litter Control Account. Any remainder from the proceeds of the sale of a junk motor vehicle after payment of the expenses shall be held for the last registered owner of the junk motor vehicle or any lienholder for ninety (90) days, after which time, if no owner or lienholder claims the remainder, it shall be deposited into the account.

Any moneys so collected and deposited into the account shall be used solely for the payment of auction, towing, removing, preserving, storing, notice, and publication costs which result from taking other junk motor vehicles, old vehicle tires, and inoperative or discarded household appliances into custody and possession.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3915.

8-6-417. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the Advisory Board on the Control of Litter and Junk, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 786, § 6. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 883, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3917.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 8, abolished the Advisory Board on the Control of Litter and Junk.

8-6-418. Possession or use of glass containers on navigable waterways — Definitions.

Except for containers for medicinal substances contained in a first-aid kit or prescribed by a licensed physician, and except as provided under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, no person shall possess or use glass containers within a vessel within the banks of Arkansas's navigable waterways.

A person engaged in removing glass previously discarded by others and found within the banks of an Arkansas navigable waterway may not be charged with a violation of this section on the basis of possession of glass, if while underway and upon a waterway, he or she transports the removed glass securely in a trash container.

A person entering, traveling upon, or otherwise using Arkansas's navigable waterways by canoe, kayak, innertube, or other vessel easily susceptible to swamping, tipping, rolling, or otherwise discharging its contents into a waterway, and transporting foodstuffs or beverages shall:

Transport all foodstuffs and beverages in a sturdy container and ensure that the sturdy container is made to seal or lock in the contents to prevent the contents from spilling into the water;

Carry and affix to the vessel a trash container or bag suitable for containing his or her refuse, waste, and trash materials and capable of being securely closed.

The trash container or bag shall be either a sturdy container, of a construction similar to a sturdy container, or a bag of mesh construction;

Except as provided under subdivision (b)(1)(C)(ii) of this section, transport all his or her refuse, waste, and trash either in a sturdy container or in a trash container to a place where the refuse, waste, and trash may be safely and lawfully disposed of.

A person engaged in removing items of refuse, waste, and trash materials previously discarded by others and found by him or her within the banks of an Arkansas navigable waterway and that are too large to be transported in a trash container or bag, may not be charged with a violation of this section on the basis of possession and transportation of the refuse, waste, and trash; and

At all times other than when a beverage is securely contained in a sturdy container or a trash container as in subdivisions (b)(1)(A)-(C) of this section, keep the beverage attached to or held within a floating holder or other device designed to prevent the beverage from sinking beneath the surface of the waterway.

Neither a sturdy container nor a trash container may be required of a person traveling without foodstuffs or beverages.

A violation of this section is a violation and each violation may be prosecuted as a separate offense.

Each violation of this section is punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

As used in this section:

“Navigable waterway” means any navigable river, lake, or other body of water used or susceptible to being used in its natural condition by canoe, kayak, innertube, or other vessel easily susceptible to swamping, tipping, or rolling, and located wholly or partly within this state;

“Sturdy container” does not include a container that is:

Primarily constructed of styrofoam; or

So constructed that it may be easily broken; and

“Vessel” does not include a houseboat, party barge, johnboat, runabout, ski boat, bass boat, or similar craft not easily susceptible to swamping, tipping, or rolling.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 803, § 1; 2003, No. 1101, § 1; 2019, No. 693, § 14.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “is a violation” for “shall be a misdemeanor” in (c)(1); and substituted “of this section is” for “shall be” in (c)(2).

Subchapter 5
— Illegal Dump Eradication and Corrective Action Program Act [Repealed effective May 1, 2020.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 11, provided:

“(a)

The purpose of this act is to have the Environmental Compliance Resource Program operational and to make illegal dump control officers unnecessary on or before May 1, 2020.

“(b)

If legislation concerning the transformation of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is enacted during this Regular Session of the General Assembly, the Arkansas Code Revisor and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall correct the references to the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality consistent with those laws”.

While Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, specifically repealed this subchapter “effective May 1, 2020”, section 11 of that act appears to assume that should the Environmental Compliance Resource Program established in the Environmental Compliance Resource Act, § 8-6-2001 et seq., become operational before May 1, 2020, then this subchapter is superseded at that point in time, and is permanently repealed on May 1, 2020, whether the program is operational or not on that date.

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter is repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, effective May 1, 2020. For current law,
see the Environmental Compliance Resource Act, § 8-6-2001 et seq.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, specifically repealed this subchapter as amended by Acts 2019, No. 315.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 938, § 9: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal year begins on July 1, and that this emergency clause is necessary in order that uniformity can be achieved at the beginning of the 1997-1998 fiscal year for money deposited into the Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund and the moneys allocated from that fund for the Illegal Dump Eradication and Corrective Action Program. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2005, No. 75, § 4: Feb. 7, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that current resources are limited to enforce the Litter Control Act; that this act authorizes illegal dumps control officers to issue citations for violations of the Litter Control Act; that this act clarifies the proper disposal of solid waste from illegal dumps; and that this act is immediately necessary to provide additional resources for the control of litter and the proper disposal of solid waste. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-501. Title. [Repealed effective May 1, 2020.]

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Illegal Dump Eradication and Corrective Action Program Act”.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 502, § 1; 1997, No. 938, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1995, No. 502, renumbered former § 8-6-501 as § 8-6-503.

This section is repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, effective May 1, 2020. For current law, see § 8-6-2001 et seq.

8-6-502. Purpose. [Repealed effective May 1, 2020.]

It is the purpose of this subchapter to set forth the policy of the state to eliminate the illegal dumping of solid waste and to provide a means of funding the Illegal Dump Eradication and Corrective Action Program. This subchapter defines illegal dumps and establishes elimination proceedings and provides a mechanism for funding.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 502, § 1; 1997, No. 938, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1995, No. 502, and Acts 1997, No. 938, renumbered former § 8-6-502 as § 8-6-504 and § 8-6-505, respectively.

This section is repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, effective May 1, 2020. For current law, see § 8-6-2001 et seq.

8-6-503. Definitions. [Repealed effective May 1, 2020.]

As used in this subchapter:

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Illegal dump” means any place at which solid waste is placed, deposited, abandoned, dumped, or otherwise disposed of in a manner that is prohibited by this subchapter or other statutes or rules, and which constitutes one (1) of the following:

An attractive nuisance;

A fire, health, or safety hazard;

A potential source of surface or groundwater contamination; or

Other contamination that is hazardous to the public health or endangers the environment;

“Illegal dumping of solid waste” means the illegal placing, depositing, dumping, or causing to be placed, deposited, or dumped by any person any solid waste that is prohibited by this chapter:

In or upon any public or private highway or road, including any portion of the right-of-way thereof;

In or upon any private property into or upon which the public is admitted by easement or license or any private property;

In or upon any public park or other public property, other than the property designated or set aside for such purpose by the governing board or body having charge thereof; or

Upon any property for which a permit has not been issued by the Division of Environmental Quality;

“Illegal dumps control officer” means an individual employed by a duly authorized regional solid waste management district within this state, a county government within this state, or a pollution control inspector or other authorized representative of the division who is empowered to ensure compliance with the provisions of this subchapter;

“Landfill” means a landfill permitted under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., except a landfill where a private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill solely for the disposal of wastes generated by the industry or wastes of a similar kind or character;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, state agency, government instrumentality or agency, institution, county, city, town, municipal authority, or trust, venture, or other legal entity, however organized; and

“Solid waste” means any garbage or refuse, sludge from a wastewater treatment plant, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution control facility, and other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial, commercial, mining, and agricultural operations and from community activities, but does not include solid or dissolved materials in domestic sewage or solid or dissolved materials in irrigation return flows or industrial discharges that are point sources subject to permit under 33 U.S.C. § 1342, or source, special nuclear, or by-product material as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 380, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2729; Acts 1995, No. 502, § 1; 1997, No. 938, § 1; 1997, No. 1207, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, §§ 66, 67; 2009, No. 1199, § 7; 2019, No. 315, § 542; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2619, 2620.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 1207, § 1, purported to add the definition for “illegal dumps control officer” to § 8-6-502. Pursuant to § 1-2-303, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission codified the definition in this section.

Publisher's Notes.

Prior to 1995, this section was codified as § 8-6-501.

This section is repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, effective May 1, 2020. For current law, see § 8-6-2001 et seq.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (4), deleted “and/oor any of” following “one (1) of” in the introductory language, and substituted “or” for “and/oor” in (4)(C).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “or rules” for “rules or regulations” in the introductory language of (4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 repealed (2) and (3); and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “department” in (5)(D).

U.S. Code.

The Atomic Energy Act of 1954, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 42 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.

8-6-504. Illegal Dump Eradication and Corrective Action Program. [Repealed effective May 1, 2020.]

The Illegal Dump Eradication and Corrective Action Program shall be administered by the Division of Environmental Quality.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 938, § 1; 2005, No. 1962, § 17; 2019, No. 910, § 2621.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 938, renumbered former § 8-6-504 as § 8-6-505.

This section is repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, effective May 1, 2020. For current law, see § 8-6-2001 et seq.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-6-505. Proceedings generally. [Repealed effective May 1, 2020.]

Any government official or employee or any person who has knowledge of or information on the illegal dumping of solid waste on any public or private property in this state may file a complaint in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county in which the illegal dumping of solid waste has taken place or in the county of residence of the person who is accused of being liable for the illegal dumping of solid waste.

Upon the filing of a verified complaint, noting on the complaint the person against whom the claim is filed, the court shall enter a temporary order directing that the accused person remove from the described public or private property the solid waste that has been illegally dumped on the property and properly dispose of the solid waste in a permitted landfill or other facility within ten (10) days from the date of the order.

The county sheriff shall serve the order.

Upon the order's being served, the accused party shall:

Remove the solid waste in question from the public or private property as described in the order;

Dispose of the solid waste at a properly permitted solid waste transfer station, landfill, recycling center, or incinerator; and

Return to the court a disposal receipt from the facility where the solid waste was disposed.

If the person wishes to challenge the order, the person may file a petition challenging the order with the court within ten (10) days from the date the order is served.

Upon the filing of a petition challenging the order, the court shall hold a hearing on it within fourteen (14) days after the filing of the petition and shall serve notice upon the accusing party and upon the accused.

At the hearing, which may be continued from time to time as determined by the court, the court shall hear all evidence and testimony and after hearing it shall enter an order either dismissing the original or temporary order or making the order permanent.

The parties represented at the hearing may be represented by counsel.

If the order is made permanent, within ten (10) days thereafter the accused party shall cause the solid waste which has been illegally dumped on private or public property to be removed from the property and disposed of properly in a permitted landfill or other facility.

If after ten (10) days from the date of the order the person against whom the order is directed has not removed the solid waste from the public or private property and properly disposed of it as noted in the order, the governmental agency or the owner of the property may cause it to be moved and shall file with a court a verified statement in writing of the cost of removal.

After reviewing the statement, if the court determines it to be reasonable, the court shall enter an order upon the judgment docket of the court of the amount of the statement, which shall be a judgment against the party against whom the judgment was issued and may be enforced as any other judgment.

Any party aggrieved by any order of a court under this subchapter may appeal from the order.

If an aggrieved party appeals to a circuit court of competent jurisdiction, then the circuit court shall try the cause de novo.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 380, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2730; Acts 1995, No. 502, § 1; 1997, No. 938, § 1; 2005, No. 75, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 938, renumbered former § 8-6-505 as § 8-6-506.

This section is repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, effective May 1, 2020. For current law, see § 8-6-2001 et seq.

8-6-506. Criminal, civil, and administrative penalties. [Repealed effective May 1, 2020.]

In addition to the proceedings described in § 8-6-505, every person convicted of a violation of this subchapter shall be subject to the criminal, civil, or administrative penalties as specified in § 8-6-204.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 502, § 1; 1997, No. 938, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 938, renumbered former § 8-6-506 as § 8-6-507.

This section is repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, effective May 1, 2020. For current law, see § 8-6-2001 et seq.

8-6-507. Consequences of unpaid fines and costs. [Repealed effective May 1, 2020.]

In all convictions for violations of the provisions of this subchapter when the fine and costs are not paid, the person convicted shall be subject to administrative or civil enforcement action.

Sanctions may include administrative, civil, or criminal penalties as provided in the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 502, § 1; 1997, No. 938, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

This section is repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, effective May 1, 2020. For current law, see § 8-6-2001 et seq.

8-6-508. Enforcement generally. [Repealed effective May 1, 2020.]

Illegal dumps control officers are empowered to ensure compliance with the provisions of this subchapter by having the right and duty to:

Inspect suspected illegal dumps;

Collect evidence of open dumping and littering and present the evidence to the prosecuting attorney or a court of competent jurisdiction where the offense was committed; and

Issue and serve citations for violations of provisions of the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., prohibiting illegal dumping, subject to exemptions under § 8-6-205 and the agricultural exemptions under § 8-6-509, and for violations of the Litter Control Act, § 8-6-401 et seq., prohibiting unlawful littering.

Citations issued by illegal dumps control officers shall be filed in any court having jurisdiction in the county where the offense is committed.

Citations may be served in person or by mailing a copy of the citation by certified mail, restricted delivery, to either the address obtained from evidence collected from the illegal dump or to the person's last known address. Persons receiving citations shall appear before the court named within the citation at the time designation in the citation.

Courts having jurisdiction over citations issued by illegal dumps control officers may issue penalties as specified in § 8-6-204(a).

Illegal dumps control officers may require violators to present signed and dated disposal receipts as evidence that the solid waste has been:

Removed from the illegal dump; and

Properly disposed of in one (1) or more of the following facilities:

A permitted landfill;

A solid waste transfer station;

A recycling center;

An incinerator;

A scrap yard that purchases iron, steel, aluminum, or other metals;

A permitted waste tire collection center or waste tire processing facility; or

Any other facility that the illegal dumps control officer finds to be a proper disposal of the solid waste.

All illegal dumps control officers shall be licensed and certified in accordance with § 8-6-901 et seq.

Illegal dumps control officers shall not have powers of arrest.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1207, § 2; 2001, No. 1686, § 1; 2005, No. 75, § 3.

Publisher's Notes.

This section is repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, effective May 1, 2020. For current law, see § 8-6-2001 et seq.

8-6-509. Agricultural operations. [Repealed effective May 1, 2020.]

The Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., this subchapter, and § 8-6-901 et seq. do not apply to:

Any place at which agricultural gleanings and crop residue resulting from operations of farms, grain elevators, cotton gins, and similar industries are being land applied according to current management practices of such industries or the agricultural community and with the consent of the landowner is not an illegal dump; and

Any landowner who disposes of solid waste on the property on which waste results from such agricultural or farming operations or household operations and such disposal does not constitute a fire, health, or safety hazard to the public.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1207, § 5.

Publisher's Notes.

This section is repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, effective May 1, 2020. For current law, see § 8-6-2001 et seq.

8-6-510. Effectiveness of regulations and orders. [Repealed effective May 1, 2020.]

None of the provisions of this act are intended to supersede any of the reuse, recycling, or fill provisions of state law of Regulation 22 of the Solid Waste Management Division of the Division of Environmental Quality.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1207, § 6; 1999, No. 1164, § 68; 2019, No. 910, § 2622.

Publisher's Notes.

This section is repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, effective May 1, 2020. For current law, see § 8-6-2001 et seq.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1997, No. 1207, codified as §§
8-6-503, 8-6-508 — 8-6-510, 8-6-901, and 8-6-905.